Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1256.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 22 O.S. 2021, Section 1105, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 172, O.S.L. 2025 (22 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 1105), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1105. A. Except as otherwise provided by this section,
upon the allowance of bail and the execution of the requisite
recognizance, bond, or undertaking to the state, the magistrate,
judge, or court shall, if the defendant is in custody, make and sign
an order for discharge. The court, in its discretion, may prescribe
by court rule the conditions under which the court clerk or deputy
court clerk, or the sheriff or deputy sheriff, may prepare and
execute an order of release on behalf of the court.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1256 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

B. No police officer or sheriff may release a person arrested
for a violation of an ex parte or final protective order as provided
in Sections 60.2 and 60.3 of this title, or arrested for an act
constituting domestic abuse as specified in Section 644 of Title 21
of the Oklahoma Statutes, or arrested for any act constituting
domestic abuse, stalking, or harassment as defined by Section 60.1
of this title, or arrested for an act constituting domestic assault
and battery or domestic assault and battery with a deadly weapon
pursuant to Section 644 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes,
without the violator appearing before a magistrate, judge, or court.
To the extent that any of the following information is available to
the court, the magistrate, judge, or court shall consider, in
addition to any other circumstances, before determining bond and
other conditions of release as necessary for the protection of the
alleged victim, the following:
1. Whether the person has a history of domestic violence or a
history of other violent acts;
2. The mental health of the person;
3. Whether the person has a history of violating the orders of
any court or governmental entity;
4. Whether the person is potentially a threat to any other
person;
5. Whether the person has a history of abusing alcohol or any
controlled substance;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1256 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

6. Whether the person has access to deadly weapons or a history
of using deadly weapons;
7. The severity of the alleged violence that is the basis of
the alleged offense including, but not limited to:
a. the duration of the alleged violent incident,
b. whether the alleged violent incident involved serious
physical injury,
c. whether the alleged violent incident involved sexual
assault,
d. whether the alleged violent incident involved
strangulation,
e. whether the alleged violent incident involved abuse
during the pregnancy of the alleged victim,
f. whether the alleged violent incident involved the
abuse of pets, or
g. whether the alleged violent incident involved forcible
entry to gain access to the alleged victim;
8. Whether a separation of the person from the alleged victim
or a termination of the relationship between the person and the
alleged victim has recently occurred or is pending;
9. Whether the person has exhibited obsessive or controlling
behaviors toward the alleged victim including, but not limited to,
stalking, surveillance, or isolation of the alleged victim;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1256 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

10. Whether the person has expressed suicidal or homicidal
ideations; and
11. Any information contained in the complaint and any police
reports, affidavits, or other documents accompanying the complaint.
C. A person arrested for:
1. A violation of an ex parte or final protective order as
provided in Sections 60.2 and 60.3 of this title;
2. An act constituting domestic abuse, domestic assault and
battery, or domestic assault and battery with a deadly weapon as
specified in Section 644 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes; or
3. An act constituting domestic abuse, stalking, or harassment
as defined by Section 60.1 of this title,
shall not be eligible for a personal recognizance bond pursuant to
Section 1108.1 of this title.
D. No police officer or sheriff may release a person arrested
for any violation of subsection G of Section 2-401 of Title 63 of
the Oklahoma Statutes, without the violator appearing before a
magistrate, judge, or court. In determining bond and other
conditions of release, the magistrate, judge, or court shall
consider any evidence that the person is in any manner dependent
upon a controlled dangerous substance or has a pattern of regular,
illegal use of any controlled dangerous substance. A rebuttable
presumption that no conditions of release on bond would assure the

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1256 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

safe ty of the community or any person therein shall arise if the
state shows by clear and convincing evidence:
1. The person was arrested for a violation of subsection G of
Section 2-401 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes, relating to
manufacturing or attempting to manufacture a controlled dangerous
substance, or possessing any of the substances listed in subsection
G of Section 2-401 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes with the
intent to manufacture a controlled dangerous substance; and
2. The person is in any manner dependent upon a controlled
dangerous substance or has a pattern of regular illegal use of a
controlled dangerous substance, and the violation referred to in
paragraph 1 of this subsection was committed or attempted in order
to maintain or facilitate the dependence or pattern of illegal use
in any manner.
E. No police officer or sheriff may release a person arrested
for a second or subsequent violation of Section 11-902 of Title 47
of the Oklahoma Statutes, without the granting of bail by a
magistrate, court, judge, or on-call judge, whether by telephone or
in person. In determining bond and other conditions of release, the
magistrate, judge, on-call judge, or court shall consider any
evidence that the person is in any manner dependent upon alcohol or
a controlled dangerous substance or has a pattern of regular abuse
of alcohol or the illegal use of any controlled dangerous substance.
If the person was arrested for any crime provided for in Section 11-
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1256 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

902 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes, the court shall consider
the threat the person poses to the public safety and shall present
written findings on the bail amount. In addition, the person may,
at the discretion of the court, be required to use an ignition
interlock device as provided by subparagraph n of paragraph 1 of
subsection A of Section 991a of Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes as
a condition of bail. If the court does not require use of an
ignition interlock device as a condition of bail, the court shall
include written findings on the reasoning for such decision.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON JUDICIARY
February 10, 2026 - DO PASS AS AMENDED













SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1256 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)